Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to  the Department of Corrections, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for  the following
purposes:
(1) Operations and health
services .................................  $ 1,296,947,807
(2) Central administration
and administrative
services .................................  $ 207,918,693
(3) Correctional services ............  $ 80,064,072
(4) Community corrections ........  $ 290,147,396
(5) Debt service ..........................  $ 96,243,575
(6) Capital improvements ...........  $ 3,057,869
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Cor-
rections, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations and health
services ................................. $ 16,358,468
(2) Central administration
and administrative
services ................................. $ 53,240,720
(3) Correctional services ............ $ 2,475,511
(4) Community corrections ........ $ 6,441,863
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$4,734,976 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds  collected or received by the Department of Cor-
rections.
Enrolled House Bill 5004 (HB 5004-A) Page 1
SECTION 4. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Passed by House June 15, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 22, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5004 (HB 5004-A) Page 2